Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3449
Practice of architecture; exempted activities.

The provisions of the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act regulating the practice of architecture do not apply to the following activities:

(1) The construction, remodeling, alteration, or renovation of a detached single-family through four-family dwelling of less than five thousand square feet of above grade finished space. Any detached or attached sheds, storage buildings, and garages incidental to the dwelling are not included in the tabulation of finished space. Such exemption may be increased by rule and regulation of the board adopted pursuant to the Negotiated Rulemaking Act but shall not exceed the Type V, column B, limitations set forth by the allowable height and building areas table in the state building code adopted in section 71-6403;

(2) The construction, remodeling, alteration, or renovation of a one-story commercial or industrial building or structure of less than five thousand square feet of above grade finished space which does not exceed thirty feet in height unless such building or structure, or the remodeling or repairing thereof, provides for the employment, housing, or assembly of twenty or more persons. Any detached or attached sheds, storage buildings, and garages incidental to the building or structure are not included in the tabulation of finished space. Such exemption may be increased by rule and regulation of the board adopted pursuant to the Negotiated Rulemaking Act but shall not exceed the Type V, column B, limitations set forth by the allowable height and building areas table in the state building code adopted in section 71-6403;

(3) The construction, remodeling, alteration, or renovation of farm buildings, including barns, silos, sheds, or housing for farm equipment and machinery, livestock, poultry, or storage, if the structures are designed to be occupied by no more than twenty persons. Such exemption may be increased by rule and regulation of the board adopted pursuant to the Negotiated Rulemaking Act but shall not exceed the Type V, column B, limitations set forth by the allowable height and building areas table in the state building code adopted in section 71-6403;

(4) Any public works project with contemplated expenditures for a completed project that do not exceed one hundred thousand dollars. The board shall adjust the dollar amount in this subdivision every fifth year. The first such adjustment after August 27, 2011, shall be effective on July 1, 2014. The adjusted amount shall be equal to the then current amount adjusted by the cumulative percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the Federal Bureau of Labor Statistics for the five-year period preceding the adjustment date. The amount shall be rounded to the next highest one-thousand-dollar amount;

(5) Any alteration, renovation, or remodeling of a building if the alteration, renovation, or remodeling does not affect architectural or engineering safety features of the building;

(6) The teaching, including research and service, of architectural subjects in a college or university offering a degree in architecture accredited by the National Architectural Accrediting Board;

(7) The preparation of submissions to architects, building officials, or other regulating authorities by the manufacturer, supplier, or installer of any materials, assemblies, components, or equipment that describe or illustrate the use of such items, the preparation of any details or shop drawings required of the contractor by the terms of the construction documents, or the management of construction contracts by persons customarily engaged in contracting work;

(8) The preparation of technical submissions or the administration of construction contracts by employees of a person or organization lawfully engaged in the practice of architecture if such employees are acting under the direct supervision of an architect;

(9) A public service provider or an organization who employs a licensee performing professional services for itself;

(10) A nonresident who holds the certification issued by the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards offering to render the professional services involved in the practice of architecture. The nonresident shall not perform any of the professional services involved in the practice of architecture until licensed as provided in the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act. The nonresident shall notify the board in writing that (a) he or she holds a National Council of Architectural Registration Boards certificate and is not currently licensed in Nebraska but will be present in Nebraska for the purpose of offering to render architectural services, (b) he or she will deliver a copy of the notice to every potential client to whom the applicant offers to render architectural services, and (c) he or she promises to apply immediately to the board for licensure if selected as the architect for the project;

(11) The practice by a qualified member of another legally recognized profession who is otherwise licensed or certified by this state or any political subdivision to perform services consistent with the laws of this state, the training, and the code of ethics of the respective profession, if such qualified member does not represent himself or herself to be practicing architecture and does not represent himself or herself to be an architect;

(12) Financial institutions making disbursements of funds in connection with construction projects;

(13) Earthmoving and related work associated with soil and water conservation practices performed on farmland or any land owned by a political subdivision that is not subject to a permit from the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment or for work related to livestock waste facilities that are not subject to a permit by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; and

(14) The work of employees and agents of a political subdivision or a nonprofit entity organized for the purpose of furnishing electrical service performing, in accordance with other requirements of law, their customary duties in the administration and enforcement of codes, permit programs, and land-use regulations and their customary duties in utility and public works construction, operation, and maintenance.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 49;

Laws 1999, LB 253, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 440, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 251;

Laws 2004, LB 599, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB45, § 14;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 45;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 173;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 461.

Negotiated Rulemaking Act, see section 84-921.